Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.140

License—Fees—Display—Inactive license.

Every licensed pharmacist who desires to practice pharmacy shall secure from the department a license, the fee for which shall be determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The administrative procedures, administrative requirements, renewal fee, and late renewal fee shall also be determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. Payment of this fee shall entitle the licensee to a pharmacy law book, subsequent current mailings of all additions, changes, or deletions in the pharmacy practice act, chapter 18.64 RCW, and all additions, changes, or deletions of commission and department regulations. The current license shall be conspicuously displayed to the public in the pharmacy to which it applies. Any licensed pharmacist who desires to leave the active practice of pharmacy in this state may secure from the department an inactive license. The initial license and renewal fees shall be determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The holder of an inactive license may reactivate his or her license to practice pharmacy in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.

[ 2013 c 19 s 12; 1996 c 191 s 47; 1991 c 229 s 7; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 421; 1984 c 153 s 11; 1979 c 90 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 201 s 6; 1963 c 38 s 9; 1949 c 153 s 2; 1935 c 98 s 5; 1899 c 121 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10136. Formerly RCW 18.64.140 and 18.64.150.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 201: See note following RCW 18.64.040.